Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 30. a. A county shall not issue a county-specific identification card to any resident of the county except as provided in paragraph âbâ . b. (1) A county authorized pursuant to chapter 321M may issue driverâs licenses, nonoperatorâs identification cards, and persons with disabilities identification devices. (2) A county may issue an identification card to a county employee or elected official relating to the employeeâs or officialâs job duties. Sec. 2. Section 364.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 24. a. A city shall not issue a city-specific identification card to any resident of the city except as provided in paragraph âbâ . House File 2296, p. 2 b. A city may issue an identification card to a city employee or elected official relating to the employeeâs or officialâs job duties. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2296, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor